Utah statutes.
73-3b-402.   Penalty.

(1)  A person who violates Section 73-3b-103 is subject to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $10,000 per day.

(2)  An action to recover damages under this section shall be brought by the state engineer in the district court in the county in which the violation occurred.



Enacted by Chapter 146, 1991 General Session

